Wisconsin, session 2025, AB194.
do enact as follows:AB194,11Section 1. 234.66 (1) (b) of the statutes is renumbered 234.66 (1) (b) (intro.) 2and amended to read:AB194,4,21234.66 (1) (b) (intro.) “Developer” means a person other than a governmental 2unit that constructs or creates residential housing. and that is any of the following:AB194,23Section 2. 234.66 (1) (b) 1. of the statutes is created to read:AB194,4,44234.66 (1) (b) 1. A person other than a governmental unit.AB194,35Section 3. 234.66 (1) (b) 2. of the statutes is created to read:AB194,4,76234.66 (1) (b) 2. A tribal housing authority or business entity created by a 7tribal council.AB194,48Section 4. 234.66 (1) (g) (intro.) and 1. of the statutes are consolidated, 9renumbered 234.66 (1) (g) and amended to read:AB194,4,1410234.66 (1) (g) “Residential housing” means new single-family or multifamily 11housing for rent or sale that satisfies all of the following: 1. Is is subject to taxation 12under ch. 70 or that is not subject to taxation under ch. 70 because, on the effective 13date of this paragraph .... [LRB inserts date], it is designated as reservation lands, 14as defined in s. 165.92 (1) (a), or trust lands, as defined in s. 165.92 (1) (d).AB194,515Section 5. 234.66 (1) (g) 2. of the statutes is repealed.AB194,616Section 6. 234.66 (1) (g) 3. of the statutes is repealed.AB194,717Section 7. 234.66 (4) (a) 5. of the statutes is renumbered 234.66 (4) (a) 5. 18(intro.) and amended to read:AB194,5,819234.66 (4) (a) 5. (intro.) The eligible governmental unit has reduced the cost of 20residential housing in connection with the eligible project by voluntarily revising 21zoning ordinances, subdivision regulations, or other land development regulations 22to increase development density, expedite approvals, reduce impact, water 23connection, and inspection fees, or reduce parking, building, or other development 24costs with respect to the development of residential housing supported by the 1project. The governmental unit’s revisions to the ordinances or regulations shall 2include revisions that were made in connection with the eligible project and 3revisions that generally apply to residential housing projects within the 4governmental unit. For purposes of this subdivision, the governmental unit in 5cooperation with the developer shall submit to the authority a cost reduction 6analysis in a form prescribed by the authority and signed by the developer and the 7head of the governmental unit’s governing body that shows the includes the 8following:AB194,5,169a. Information that clearly shows the estimated time or dollar amount saved 10by the developer and the estimated percentage reduction in housing costs for each 11cost reduction measures measure, including any time saving measures measure, 12undertaken by the governmental unit on or after January 1, 2023, that have has 13reduced the cost of residential housing in connection with the eligible project. The 14signed analysis shall clearly show for each time saving or cost reduction measure 15the estimated time or dollar amount saved by the developer and the estimated 16percentage reduction in housing costs.AB194,817Section 8. 234.66 (4) (a) 5. b. of the statutes is created to read:AB194,5,2418234.66 (4) (a) 5. b. Information that clearly shows the estimated time or dollar 19amount reduction and the estimated percentage reduction in housing costs for each 20cost reduction measure, including any time saving measure, undertaken by the 21governmental unit on or after January 1, 2023, that generally applies to residential 22housing projects within the governmental unit and that has reduced the cost of 23residential housing within the governmental unit. These cost and time saving 24measures may include the cost and time saving measures of the eligible project.AB194,91Section 9. 234.66 (4) (a) 7. of the statutes is amended to read:AB194,6,92234.66 (4) (a) 7. If applicable, the eligible governmental unit has updated the 3housing element of its comprehensive plan under s. 66.1001 (2) (b) within the 5 4years immediately preceding the date of the loan application. This condition may be 5satisfied if, within the 5 years immediately preceding the date of the loan 6application, the governmental unit adopts an ordinance or resolution certifying 7that the housing element of its current comprehensive plan provides an adequate 8housing supply that meets existing and forecasted housing demand in the 9governmental unit.AB194,1010Section 10. 234.66 (4) (c) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB194,6,1311234.66 (4) (c) 2. No loan awarded under this subsection may exceed 20 33 12percent of the total cost of development, including land purchase, of the residential 13housing supported by the eligible project.AB194,1114Section 11. 234.66 (5) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:AB194,6,1715234.66 (5) (c) No loan awarded under this subsection may exceed 10 25 16percent of the amount of the total cost of development of the residential housing 17supported by the eligible project.AB194,1218Section 12. 234.66 (5m) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB194,6,2419234.66 (5m) (b) Require that the full amount of each loan awarded under sub. 20(4) is secured by one or more unlimited personal or corporate guarantees, unless the 21developer provides no personal or corporate guarantee on any first mortgage for the 22eligible project and the developer’s total debt associated with the project does not 23exceed 75 percent of the total collateral value of the project, as determined by the 24authority.AB194,131Section 13. 234.661 (1) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB194,7,42234.661 (1) (b) “Eligible political subdivision governmental unit” means the 3city, village, town, or county governmental unit having jurisdiction over an eligible 4project, as determined by the authority.AB194,145Section 14. 234.661 (1) (c) 5. of the statutes is repealed. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab194 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab194 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB194 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB194 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB194: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting